Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-346
Proof of financial responsibility, defined.

Proof of financial responsibility means evidence of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of such proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, (1) in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, (2) subject to such limit for one person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and (3) in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 46.